Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.610

Tariff for irrigation pumping service—Authority for locally regulated utility to buy back electricity.

The board may approve a tariff for irrigation pumping service that allows the locally regulated utility to buy back electricity from customers to reduce electricity usage by those customers during the locally regulated utility's particular irrigation season.

[ 2001 c 122 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 122: See note following RCW 80.28.310.